Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB336.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Solar Energy Facility Location Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abandoned mine." An area of land that is no longer in use and is placed upon, under or above the surface of another area of land by a person, used in extracting a natural resource from its natural deposits in the earth by any means or method."Agricultural land." Land that is used or capable of being used for a normal agricultural operation.123456789101112131415161718 "Brownfield." A property, the expansion, redevelopment or reuse of which may be complicated by the presence or potential presence of a hazardous substance, pollutant or contaminant."Capped landfill." A capped facility of trash and garbage disposal in which the waste is buried between layers of earth."Department." The Department of Agriculture of the Commonwealth."Normal agricultural operation." As defined in section 2 of the act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), referred to as the Right-to-Farm Law."Parking facility canopy." A structure that is constructed over the top of a public or private parking lot."Solar energy facility." A facility that is designed for the supply of merchant power and utilizes solar energy to produce or distribute energy."Warehouse rooftop." A roof that is located on a building or group of buildings primarily used for indoor storage, transfer and distribution of products and materials, but not including retail uses or a truck terminal. The term includes a roof of a distribution facility, fulfillment center, logistics facility and similar buildings.Section 3. Location of solar energy facilities.A solar energy facility may not be located on agricultural land with soil that is deemed Class 1 or Class 2 within the Land Capability Classification System of the Natural Resource Conservation Service.Section 4. Soil classification certification.(a) Request for determination.--The owner of agricultural land that wishes to lease the land for the purposes of siting a solar energy facility must submit a written request to the 20250SB0336PN0272 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department for a determination as to whether the land is considered Class 1 or Class 2 soil. The request must be submitted in such form and manner as prescribed by the department.(b) Review and certification by department.--(1) Within 30 days of receipt of a written request submitted under subsection (a), the department shall review the request to determine whether the proposed solar facility is located on Class 1 or Class 2 soil.(2) The department shall provide notification to the requester after a determination is made electronically, if electronic contact information is available, and by certified and registered mail.Section 5. Tax credit.(a) Eligibility.--The owner of a solar energy facility may claim an annual tax credit against the owner's tax liability under Article IV of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(b) Application.--(1) The owner of a solar energy facility may apply to the Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth for a tax credit under this section. The application shall be on the form required by the Department of Community and Economic Development.(2) The application must be submitted to the Department of Community and Economic Development by February 1 of each year for the tax credit claimed during the prior calendar year.(c) Amount.--The tax credit shall be equal to 3¢ per kilowatt, but not to exceed 30% of the project's cost of 20250SB0336PN0272 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electricity generated for the first 10 years of the solar energy facility's operation.(d) Annual limit.--The total amount of tax credits issued by the Department of Community and Economic Development under this section may not exceed $5,000,000 in a fiscal year.(e) Review and approval.--(1) The Department of Community and Economic Development shall review and approve applications meeting the requirements of this article by March 20 of each year.(2) The Department of Community and Economic Development may require information necessary to document that a solar energy facility qualifies as an eligible facility.(3) In the review of an application for a tax credit under this section, the Department of Community and Economic Development shall consult with the Department of Environmental Protection with respect to whether a solar facility qualifies as an eligible facility under subsection (g).(4) Prior to approving an application, the applicant must have:(i) filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years; and(ii) paid any balance of State tax due as determined by assessment or determination by the Department of Revenue and not under timely appeal.(5) Upon approval, the Department of Community and Economic Development shall issue a certificate stating the amount of tax credit granted for electricity generated in the prior calendar year.(f) Availability of tax credits.--Tax credits under this 20250SB0336PN0272 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section shall be made available by the Department of Community and Economic Development on a first-come, first-served basis within the limitation established under subsection (d).(g) Land eligible for tax credit.--Any of the following land is eligible for the tax credit:(1) Land that is located on a brownfield.(2) Land that consists of an abandoned mine.(3) Land that consists of a capped landfill.(4) Land that consists of a warehouse rooftop.(5) Land that consists of a parking facility canopy.Section 6. Applicability.This act does not apply to:(1) A solar energy facility sited or under a solar energy facility agreement entered into prior to the effective date of this paragraph.(2) A solar energy facility with a nameplate capacity of two megawatts AC or less.(3) A customer-generator as defined in section 2 of the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act.(4) Agricultural land where Class 1 and Class 2 soils make up a de minimis portion, as determined by the department, of the total land parcel proposed for a solar energy facility.Section 7. Enforcement.An action to enjoin the development or construction, or to require the removal of, a solar energy facility in violation of this act may be brought, in the name of the Commonwealth, by the Attorney General, the department or the municipality at issue.Section 8. Effective date.20250SB0336PN0272 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0336PN0272 - 6 - 1